District of Columbia statutes.
9-1161

Severability.

If a provision of this chapter or its application to a particular person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications.

May 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-67, § 12, 27 DCR 1266